Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1188
Resource Recovery Fund; created; use; investment.

The Resource Recovery Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Administrative Services. All proceeds from the program required by section 81-1186 and fifteen percent of all proceeds from the sale of surplus property sold to be remanufactured or reprocessed shall be deposited in the fund. The fund shall be used for the administration and implementation of the program, except that transfers from the fund to the General Fund may be made at the direction of the Legislature.

Any money in the Resource Recovery Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the Resource Recovery Fund to the General Fund within fifteen days after July 1, 2002.

Laws 1986, LB 380, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1140.05;

Laws 1990, LB 987, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 429, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1991, § 81-1647;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 99;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 105;

Laws 2002, LB 1310, § 19.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.